Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.12, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Substance use disorder provider rate increase. For the substance use disorder services listed in section 254B.05, subdivision 5, new text begin not eligible for the rate increase under subdivision 5, new text end and provided on or after July 1, 2017, payment rates shall be increased by one percent over the rates in effect on January 1, 2017, for vendors who meet the requirements of section 254B.05. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.12, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Substance use disorder provider rate increase. new text end new text begin For residential substance use disorder services listed in section 254B.05, subdivision 5, paragraph (b), clauses (1), (6), (8), (9), and (10), and provided on or after July 1, 2025, payment rates shall be increased by 50 percent over the rates in effect on January 1, 2025, for vendors who meet the requirements of section 254B.05. new text end